Utah statutes.
9-4-627.   Powers of public body aiding in project.
(1)  For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking,
construction, or operation of projects located within its jurisdiction, any
public body may, with or without consideration, as it may determine:
(a)  dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in property, or
grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges to a housing
authority or the federal government;
(b)  cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water,
sewer, or drainage facilities, or other works that it is otherwise empowered
to undertake to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with these projects;
(c)  furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan
streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other places that it is
otherwise empowered to undertake;
(d)  plan or replan, zone or rezone any parts of the public body, make
exceptions from building regulations and ordinances, and make changes in its
map;
(e)  cause the same services to be furnished to a housing authority that the
public body may furnish, and provide facilities and services, including
feeding facilities and services for tenants, in connection with housing
projects;
(f)  enter into agreements with respect to the exercise by the public body of
its powers relating to the repair, improvement, condemnation, closing, or
demolition of unsafe, insanitary, or unfit buildings;
(g)  notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, use any funds belonging
to or within the control of the public body, including funds derived from the
sale or furnishing of property or facilities to a housing authority, in the
purchase of the bonds or other obligations of a housing authority and exercise
any related rights;
(h)  do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the
planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of any projects;
(i)  incur the entire expense of public improvements made by a public body in
exercising the powers granted in this part; and
(j)  enter into agreements, that may extend over any period notwithstanding
any provision or rule of law to the contrary, with a housing authority
respecting action to be taken by a public body pursuant to any of the powers
granted by this part.
(2)  If title to or possession of any project is held by any public
governmental agency authorized by law to engage in the development or
administration of low-rent housing or slum clearance projects, including any
agency or instrumentality of the United States, the provisions of the
agreements entered into pursuant to Subsection (1)(j) shall inure to the
benefit of and may be enforced by that public body or governmental agency.
(3)  Any sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this section
may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement,
or public bidding, notwithstanding any other laws to the contrary.
